North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-29 Veterinarians
43-29-19.
Veterinary prescription drugs.

Except as provided under subsection 2, a veterinary prescription drug must be dispensed, used, or prescribed within the context of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship.

Other than a controlled substance, a licensed veterinarian may dispense a veterinary prescription drug without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship if:

The drug is prescribed by a licensed veterinarian or by a veterinarian licensed in another jurisdiction who has established a veterinarian-client-patient relationship;

The prescribing veterinarian has an inadequate supply of the drug, failure to dispense the drug would interrupt a therapeutic regimen, or failure to dispense the drug would cause an animal to suffer; and

The dispensing veterinarian verifies the prescription with the prescribing veterinarian.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 320, § 2.